Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1800.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "marriage" in section 1102 of Title 23 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 1102. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this part shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Marriage." [A civil contract by which one man and one woman 1234567891011121314151617 take each other for husband and wife.] A civil contract between two individuals.* * *Section 2. Section 1704 of Title 23 is repealed:[§ 1704. Marriage between persons of the same sex.It is hereby declared to be the strong and longstanding public policy of this Commonwealth that marriage shall be between one man and one woman. A marriage between persons of the same sex which was entered into in another state or foreign jurisdiction, even if valid where entered into, shall be void in this Commonwealth.]Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1800PN2214 - 2 - 123456789101112